New York, session 2025-2026, A2037.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 30 of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the 2 insurance law, as amended by section 5 of subpart A of part BB of chap- 3 ter 57 of the laws of 2019, is amended by adding a new subparagraph (H) 4 to read as follows: 5 (H) A policy providing coverage under this paragraph shall include 6 coverage for at least ninety days at a rehabilitation facility; 7 provided, however, that any stay in a rehabilitation facility required 8 to be covered pursuant to this paragraph shall require the referral of a 9 doctor. 10 § 2. Paragraph 6 of subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance 11 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (H) to read as follows: 12 (H) A policy providing coverage under this paragraph shall include 13 coverage for at least ninety days at a rehabilitation facility; 14 provided, however, that any stay in a rehabilitation facility required 15 to be covered pursuant to this paragraph shall require the referral of a 16 doctor. 17 § 3. Subsection (k) of section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by 18 adding a new paragraph 8 to read as follows: 19 (8) A policy providing coverage under this subsection shall include 20 coverage for at least ninety days at a rehabilitation facility; 21 provided, however, that any stay in a rehabilitation facility required EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03675-01-5 A. 2037 2 1 to be covered pursuant to this subsection shall require the referral of 2 a doctor. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 4 have become a law and shall apply to any policy issued, amended, or 5 renewed on and after such effective date.